North Carolina, session 2025, SB549.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, Article 2 of Chapter 126 of the General
Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 126-8.7. Paid leave for pregnancy loss.
(a) The State Human Resources Commission (Commission) shall adopt rules and policies
to provide that a permanent, probationary, or time-limited full-time State employee shall be
granted paid leave for pregnancy loss. For the purposes of this section, the term "pregnancy loss"
means a miscarriage, an unsuccessful round of intrauterine insemination or of an assisted
reproductive technology procedure, a failed adoption arrangement, a failed surrogacy
arrangement, or a diagnosis or event that impacts pregnancy or fertility.
(b) The Commission shall adopt rules and policies to provide that a permanent,
probationary, or time-limited part-time State employee shall be granted a prorated amount of
paid leave for pregnancy loss on an equitable basis.
(c) The rules and policies adopted by the Commission shall include the following
requirements, at the minimum:
(1) That the duration of leave for pregnancy loss shall be not less than 56 hours
of paid leave.
(2) That an employee requesting the paid leave shall submit a request for leave to
process and address their own health needs and the health needs of their
partners during the time period following a pregnancy loss.
(3) A period of minimum service before an employee becomes eligible for paid
leave under this section. The rules shall provide that the period of minimum
service may be met by aggregating employment at any of the following:
a. State agencies, departments, and institutions, including The University
of North Carolina.
b. Public school units that provide paid leave in accordance with this
section.
c. Community colleges located in this State.
(d) The leave authorized by this section:
(1) Is available without exhaustion of the employee's sick and vacation leave and
is awarded in addition to shared leave under G.S. 126-8.3, or other leave
authorized by State or federal law.
*S549-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Has no cash value upon termination from employment.
(3) May not be used for calculating an employee's retirement benefits.
(e) The provisions of this section shall apply to employees of State agencies,
departments, and institutions, including The University of North Carolina; to public school
employees; and to community college employees. The appropriate governing board, officer, or
entity shall adopt rules and policies to award paid leave for pregnancy loss to employees that are
substantially equivalent to those adopted by the State Human Resources Commission."
SECTION 1.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 126-5(c19) reads as rewritten:
"(c19) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, G.S. 126-8.6 applies and
126-8.7 apply to all State employees, public school employees, and community college
employees. G.S. 126-8.6 does and 126-8.7 do not apply to employees described in subdivisions
(2) and (3) of subsection (c1) of G.S. 126-5. The legislative and judicial branches shall adopt
parental leave and paid bereavement leave policies."
SECTION 1.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Reserve for Compensation Increases the sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars
($1,800,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($1,800,000) for the 2025-2027 fiscal year to fund paid leave for pregnancy loss as
enacted in this section.
SECTION 1.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to requests
for pregnancy loss leave occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, Article 2 of Chapter 126 of the General
Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 126-8.8. Paid bereavement leave for death of immediate family member.
(a) The State Human Resources Commission (Commission) shall adopt rules and policies
to provide that a permanent, probationary, or time-limited full-time State employee shall be
granted up to three consecutive workdays of paid bereavement leave on the death of any member
of the employee's immediate family. For the purposes of this section, "immediate family
member" means a spouse, parent, child, brother, sister, grandparent, or grandchild. The term
includes the step, half, and in-law relationships.
(b) The Commission shall adopt rules and policies to provide that a permanent,
probationary, or time-limited part-time State employee shall be granted a prorated amount of
paid bereavement leave on an equitable basis.
(c) The rules and policies adopted by the Commission shall include the following
requirements, at a minimum:
(1) That an employee requesting paid bereavement leave submit a statement
stating the name and relationship of the deceased.
(2) A period of minimum service before an employee becomes eligible for paid
bereavement leave under this section. The rules shall provide that the period
of minimum service may be met by aggregating employment at any of the
following:
a. State agencies, departments, and institutions, including The University
of North Carolina.
b. Public school units that provide paid bereavement leave in accordance
with this section.
c. Community colleges located in this State.
(d) The paid bereavement leave authorized by this section:
(1) Is available without exhaustion of the employee's sick and vacation leave and
is awarded in addition to shared leave under G.S. 126-8.3, or other leave
authorized by State or federal law.
(2) Has no cash value upon termination from employment.
(3) May not be used for calculating an employee's retirement benefits.
Page 2 Senate Bill 549-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) The provisions of this section shall apply to employees of State agencies,
departments, and institutions, including The University of North Carolina; to public school
employees; and to community college employees. The appropriate governing board, officer, or
entity shall adopt rules and policies to award paid bereavement leave to employees that are
substantially equivalent to those adopted by the State Human Resources Commission."
SECTION 2.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, G.S. 126-5(c19), as amended by Section 1
of this act, reads as rewritten:
"(c19) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, G.S. 126-8.6 and G.S. 126-8.7
G.S. 126-8.6, 126-8.7, and 126-8.8 apply to all State employees, public school employees, and
community college employees. G.S. 126-8.6 and G.S. 126-8.7 G.S. 126-8.6, 126-8.7, and
126-8.8 do not apply to employees described in subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (c1) of
G.S. 126-5. The legislative and judicial branches shall adopt parental leave and pregnancy loss
leave policies."
SECTION 2.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Reserve for Compensation Increases the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to fund paid bereavement leave as enacted in this section
SECTION 2.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to requests
for paid bereavement leave for deaths occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 549-First Edition Page 3